Wisconsin, session 2025, SB783.
do enact as follows:SB783,11Section 1. 106.276 (1) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB783,2,52106.276 (1) (c) 1. The applicant provides, or pays for a 3rd-party to provide, to 3an individual who resides in this state training in the operation of commercial 4motor vehicles that satisfies the requirements of 49 CFR part 380, subparts F and 5G.SB783,26Section 2. 106.276 (1) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB783,2,97106.276 (1) (c) 2. The applicant or other 3rd party described in subd. 1. that 8provides the training is listed on the Training Provider Registry (TPR), as set forth 9in 49 CFR part 380, subpart G.SB783,310Section 3. 106.276 (1) (c) 2m. of the statutes is amended to read:SB783,2,1311106.276 (1) (c) 2m. The applicant has a facility one or more facilities located in 12this state that is listed in the Training Provider Registry described in subd. 2., and 13the training described in subd. 1. is provided at or through that facility.SB783,414Section 4. 106.276 (1) (c) 3. of the statutes is renumbered 106.276 (1) (c) 3. a. 15and amended to read:SB783,2,1916106.276 (1) (c) 3. a. The Except as provided in subd. 3. b., the individual for 17whom the applicant provides who receives the training under subd. 1. obtains an 18initial commercial driver license, as defined in s. 340.01 (7m), in this state after 19March 23, 2024.SB783,51Section 5. 106.276 (1) (c) 3. b. of the statutes is created to read:SB783,3,52106.276 (1) (c) 3. b. If the applicant is not a training provider as described in 3subd. 1., the individual for whom the applicant provides training under subd. 1. 4obtains an initial commercial driver license, as defined in s. 340.01 (7m), in this 5state after the effective date of this subd. 3. b. .... [LRB inserts date].SB783,66Section 6. 106.276 (1) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:SB783,3,87106.276 (1) (cm) The department may not award more than one grant with 8respect to a given individual who is trained as described in par. (c) 1.SB783,3,99